Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0007.
people of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 3 Sec. 14b. This chapter applies to the following felonies enumerated in chapters 408 to 420 of the Michigan Compiled Laws: M.C.L. Category Class Description Stat Max 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 408.484(2) Pub trst G Payment of wages and fringe benefits ï¿½ requiring nondisclosure of wages ï¿½ subsequent violation 2 408.485(b) Pub trst E Subsequent violation of act regarding payment of wages and fringe benefits with intent to defraud ï¿½ value of more than $200.00 but less than $1,000.00 5 408.485(c) Pub trst E Violation of act regarding payment of wages and fringe benefits with intent to defraud ï¿½ value of more than $1,000.00 but less than $20,000.00 5 Pub trst D Subsequent violation of act regarding payment of wages and fringe benefits with intent to defraud ï¿½ value of more than $1,000.00 but less than $20,000.00 10 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 408.485(d) Pub trst D Violation of act regarding payment of wages and fringe benefits with intent to defraud ï¿½ value of more than $20,000.00 but less than $50,000.00 10 408.485(e) Pub trst C Violation of act regarding payment of wages and fringe benefits with intent to defraud ï¿½ value of more than $50,000.00 but less than $100,000.00 15 408.485(f) Pub trst B Violation of act regarding payment of wages and fringe benefits with intent to defraud ï¿½ value of $100,000.00 or more 20 408.1035(5) Person H MIOSHA violation causing employee death 1 Person G MIOSHA violation causing employee death ï¿½ subsequent offense 3 408.1035a(5) Person H MIOSHA violation causing employee death 1 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 Person G MIOSHA violation causing employee death ï¿½ subsequent offense 3 409.122(2) Person G Employment of children during certain hours ï¿½ second offense 2 Person E Employment of children during certain hours ï¿½ third or subsequent offense 10 409.122(3) Person D Employment of children in child sexually abusive activity 20 Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. 6 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.